Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.20.300

Schools of medicine, dentistry, and related health services—Authorization.

The board of regents of the University of Washington is hereby authorized and directed forthwith to establish, operate and maintain schools of medicine, dentistry, and related health sciences at the university.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.20.300. Prior: 1945 c 15 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 4566-5. Formerly RCW 28.77.200.]

NOTES:

Autopsy of deceased infant under three years, delivery of body to University of Washington medical school for purposes of, costs: RCW 68.50.100, 68.50.104.

Requisites for accreditation and approval of medical schools: RCW 18.71.055.